Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
SUBPART A
IN GENERAL

19-2.5-1101. Presentence investigation.

Prior to the sentencing hearing, juvenile probation for the judicial district in which the juvenile is adjudicated shall conduct a presentence investigation unless waived by the court on its own determination or on recommendation of the prosecution or
the juvenile. The presentence investigation must take into consideration and build on the intake assessment performed by the screening team. The presentence investigation may address, but is not limited to, the following:

The details of the offense;

Statements made by the victims of the offense;

The amount of restitution, if any, that should be imposed on the juvenile or the juvenile's parent, guardian, or legal custodian;

The juvenile's previous criminal record, if any, if the juvenile has not been adjudicated for an act that constitutes unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section 16-22-102 (9);

Any history of substance abuse by the juvenile;

The juvenile's education history, including any special education history and any current individualized education program the juvenile may have pursuant to section 22-20-108;

The juvenile's employment history;

The juvenile's family, kin, and persons having a significant relationship with the juvenile;

The juvenile's peer relationships;

The status of juvenile programs and community placements in the juvenile's judicial district of residence;

Other related material;

Review of placement and commitment criteria adopted pursuant to section 19-2.5-1404, which are the criteria for any sentencing recommendations included in the presentence investigation;

Assessment of the juvenile's needs; and

Recommendations and a proposed treatment plan for the juvenile.

If the juvenile has been adjudicated for an act that constitutes unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), then the report on the presentence investigation must include the juvenile's previous criminal and juvenile delinquency records,
if any.

The probation department shall conduct a presentence investigation in each case unless waived by the court on its own determination or on recommendation of the prosecution or the juvenile. The level of detail included in the presentence investigation
may vary, as appropriate, with the services being considered for the juvenile.

Except as set forth in subsection (2)(b)(II) of this section, if the juvenile is adjudicated on or after July 1, 2018, the report described in subsection (1)(a) of this section must include the following statement:

The report described in subsection (1)(a) of this section need not include the statement described in subsection (2)(b)(I) of this section if the juvenile:

Has been adjudicated for a felony that included an element that requires a victim to suffer a serious bodily injury and the victim suffered a permanent impairment of the function of any part or organ of the body;

Has been adjudicated for a crime of violence as described in section 18-1.3-406; or

Is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to section 16-22-103.

The state court administrator may implement a behavioral or mental health disorder screening program to be used by the juvenile court. If the state court administrator chooses to implement a behavioral or mental health disorder screening program, the
juvenile court shall use the standardized behavioral or mental health disorder screening developed pursuant to section 16-11.9-102 and conduct the screening in accordance with the procedures established pursuant to
section 16-11.9-102. The findings and results of any standardized behavioral or mental health disorder screening conducted pursuant to this subsection (3) must be included in the written report to the court prepared
and submitted pursuant to this section.

Prior to implementation of a behavioral or mental health disorder screening program pursuant to this subsection (3), if implementation of the program would require an increase in appropriations, the state court administrator shall submit to the joint
budget committee a request for funding in the amount necessary to implement the behavioral or mental health disorder screening program. If implementation of the behavioral or mental health disorder screening program
would require an increase in appropriations, implementation of the program is conditional upon approval of the funding request.

Prior to sentencing a juvenile who was adjudicated for an offense that would be a felony or misdemeanor not contained in title 42 if committed by an adult, the court may order the juvenile to participate in an assessment to determine whether the juvenile
would be suitable for participation in restorative justice practices that would be a part of the juvenile's sentence; except that the court may not order participation in a restorative justice practice if the juvenile was adjudicated
a delinquent for unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9); a crime in which the underlying factual basis involves domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3 (1); stalking, as defined in section
18-3-602; or violation of a protection order, as defined in section 18-6-803.5. If the court orders a suitability assessment, the assessor shall provide the services for a fee of no more than forty dollars based on a sliding
scale consistent with guidelines used to determine eligibility for appointment of counsel. The court shall not include payment of this fee as part of any court order. If a juvenile wants to participate in restorative justice
practices, the juvenile must make the request to the district attorney or the law enforcement agency administering the program and may not make the request to the victim. If requested by the juvenile or law enforcement agency,
a victim-offender conference may only be conducted after the victim is consulted by the district attorney and offered an opportunity to participate or submit a victim impact statement. If a victim elects not to attend, a victim-offender
conference may be held with a suitable victim surrogate or victim advocate, and the victim may submit a victim impact statement. If the juvenile participates in a restorative justice practices victim-offender conference, the
facilitator shall provide these services for a fee of no more than one hundred twenty-five dollars based on a sliding scale consistent with guidelines used to determine eligibility for appointment of counsel. The court shall
not include payment of this fee as part of any court order.

Each adjudicated juvenile may, at the time of adjudication or at any time thereafter, apply to the court for an order of collateral relief of the consequences of the juvenile's adjudication pursuant to section 19-2.5-910, Colorado Revised Statutes.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 631, § 2, effective October 1; (4) amended, (HB 21-1315), ch. 461, p. 3117, § 27, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-905 as it existed prior to 2021.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1315, see section 1 of chapter 461, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

19-2.5-1102. Sentencing hearing.

After making a finding of guilt, the court shall hear evidence on the question of the proper disposition best serving the interests of the juvenile and the public. Such evidence includes but is not necessarily limited to the social study and other reports
as provided in section 19-1-107.

In cases in which the juvenile is adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for an act that constitutes unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9), the court shall consider the juvenile's previous criminal and juvenile delinquency records,
if any, set forth in the presentence investigation report prepared pursuant to section 19-2.5-1101 (1)(b) in determining the proper disposition for the juvenile and the public.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2024.] If the court has reason to believe that the juvenile may have an intellectual and developmental disability, the court shall refer the juvenile to the community-centered board
in the designated service area where the action is pending for an eligibility determination pursuant to article 10.5 of title 27. If the court has reason to believe that the juvenile may have a behavioral or mental health disorder,
the court shall order a mental health placement prescreening to be conducted in any appropriate place.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2024.

]
If the court has reason to believe that the juvenile may have an intellectual and developmental disability, the court shall refer the juvenile to the case management agency, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702,
in the defined service area where the action is pending for an eligibility determination pursuant to article 10.5 of title 27. If the court has reason to believe that the juvenile may have a behavioral or mental health
disorder, the court shall order a mental health placement prescreening to be conducted in any appropriate place.

If the court receives a mental health screening or mental health assessment pursuant to section 19-2.5-612 determining that the juvenile could benefit from mental health services, or the court already has sufficient information to determine that the juvenile
could benefit from mental health services, the court may order mental health services as a part of the disposition.

The court may continue the sentencing hearing, either on its own motion or on the motion of any interested party, for a reasonable period to receive reports or other evidence; except that the court shall determine sentencing within forty-nine days after
completion of the adjudicatory trial.

If the hearing is continued, the court shall make an appropriate order for detention of the juvenile or for the juvenile's release in the custody of the juvenile's parents, guardian, or other responsible person or agency under such conditions of supervision
as the court may impose during the continuance.

In scheduling investigations and hearings, the court shall give priority to proceedings concerning a juvenile who is in detention or who has otherwise been removed from the home before an order of disposition has been made.

In any case in which the sentence is placement out of the home, except for juveniles committed to the department of human services, the court shall, at the time of placement, set a review within ninety-one days to determine if continued placement is necessary
and is in the best interest of the juvenile and of the community. The court shall give notice of the review to all parties and to the director of the facility or agency in which the juvenile is placed and any person who has
physical custody of the juvenile and any attorney or guardian ad litem of record.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 634, § 2, effective October 1; (2) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 327, § 9, effective July 1, 2024.

19-2.5-1103. Sentencing schedule - options.

Upon completion of the sentencing hearing pursuant to section 19-2.5-1102, the court shall enter a decree of sentence or commitment imposing any of the following sentences or combination of sentences, as appropriate:

Commitment to the department of human services pursuant to section 19-2.5-1117;

Confinement in the county jail or in community corrections pursuant to section 19-2.5-1118;

Detention pursuant to section 19-2.5-1123;

Placement of legal custody of the juvenile with a relative or other suitable person pursuant to section 19-2.5-1112;

Probation pursuant to section 19-2.5-1106;

Commitment to the community accountability program pursuant to section 19-2.5-1111;

Placement of legal custody of the juvenile in the county department of human or social services or a child placement agency pursuant to section 19-2.5-1115;

Placement of the juvenile in a hospital or other suitable facility for receipt of special care pursuant to section 19-2.5-1114;

Imposition of a fine pursuant to section 19-2.5-1105;

Ordering the juvenile to pay restitution pursuant to section 19-2.5-1104;

Ordering the juvenile to complete an anger management treatment program or any other appropriate treatment program pursuant to section 19-2.5-1122;

Participation in an evaluation to determine whether the juvenile would be suitable for restorative justice practices that would be a part of the juvenile's sentence; except that the court may not order participation in restorative justice practices if
the juvenile was adjudicated a delinquent for unlawful sexual behavior, as defined in section 16-22-102 (9); a crime in which the underlying factual basis involves domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3
(1); stalking, as defined in section 18-3-602; or violation of a protection order, as defined in section 18-6-803.5. If the court orders participation in restorative justice practices, the facilitator shall provide
these services for a fee of no more than one hundred twenty-five dollars based on a sliding scale consistent with guidelines used to determine eligibility for appointment of counsel. The court shall not include payment
of this fee as part of any court order. Nothing in this subsection (1)(l) requires a victim to participate in a restorative justice victim-offender conference.

The judge shall sentence any juvenile adjudicated as a special offender pursuant to section 19-2.5-1126.

Any sentence imposed on a juvenile pursuant to this section may include the juvenile's parent or guardian pursuant to section 19-2.5-1110.

If, as a condition of or in connection with any sentence imposed pursuant to this section, the court requires a juvenile to attend school, the court shall notify the school district in which the juvenile is enrolled of such requirement.

Except as otherwise set forth in section 19-2.5-1127 for an aggravated juvenile offender, if the court finds that placement out of the home is necessary and is in the best interests of the juvenile and the community, the court shall place the juvenile,
following the criteria established pursuant to section 19-2.5-1404, in the facility or setting that most appropriately meets the needs of the juvenile, the juvenile's family, and the community. In making its decision
as to proper placement, the court shall utilize the evaluation for placement prepared pursuant to section 19-1-107 or the evaluation for placement required by section 19-1-115 (8)(e). Any placement recommendation in
the evaluation prepared by the county department of human or social services must be accorded great weight as the placement that most appropriately meets the needs of the juvenile, the juvenile's family, and the community.
A recommendation prepared by the county department of human or social services must set forth specific facts and reasons for the placement recommendation. If the evaluation for placement recommends placement in a facility
located in Colorado that can provide appropriate treatment and that will accept the juvenile, then the court shall not place the juvenile in a facility outside this state. If the court places the juvenile in a facility
located in Colorado other than one recommended by the evaluation for placement, in a facility located outside this state in accordance with the evaluation for placement, or in a facility in which the average monthly
cost exceeds the amount established by the general assembly in the general appropriation bill, it shall make specific findings of fact, including the monthly cost of the facility in which the juvenile is placed, relating
to its placement decision. A copy of the findings must be sent to the chief justice of the supreme court, who shall, notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), report monthly to the joint budget committee and annually
to the house and senate committees on health and human services, or any successor committees, on such placements. If the court commits the juvenile to the state department of human services, it shall not make a specific
placement, nor is this subsection (5) relating to specific findings of fact applicable.

If the court sentences a juvenile to an out-of-home placement funded by the state department of human services or any county, or commits a juvenile to the state department of human services, and the receiving agency determines that the placement or commitment
does not follow the criteria established pursuant to section 19-2.5-1404, including the placement recommended by the receiving agency, the receiving agency may, after assessing the juvenile's needs, file a petition
with the court for reconsideration of the placement or commitment. The petition must be filed not later than thirty-five days after the placement or commitment. The court shall hear the petition and enter an order thereon
not later than thirty-five days after the filing of the petition, and after notice to all agencies or departments that might be affected by the resolution of the petition, and after all such agencies or departments
have had an opportunity to participate in the hearing on the petition. Failure of any such agency or department to appear may be a basis for refusal to accept a subsequent petition by the agency or department that had
an opportunity to appear and be present at the original petition hearing. The notification to the parties required pursuant to this subsection (5)(b) must be made by the petitioning party, and proof of the service must
be filed with the court. If the court sentences a juvenile to an out-of-home placement funded by the county department of human or social services, temporary legal custody of the juvenile must be placed with the county
department of human or social services, and the placement recommended by the county department must be accorded great weight as the placement that most appropriately meets the needs of the juvenile, the juvenile's family,
and the community. Any deviation from the recommendation must be supported by specific findings on the record of the case detailing the specific extraordinary circumstances that constitute the reasons for deviations
from the placement recommendation of the county department of human or social services.

Repealed.

The juvenile court in each judicial district may implement a behavioral or mental health disorder screening program to screen juveniles sentenced pursuant to this part 11. If the juvenile court chooses to implement a behavioral or mental health disorder
screening program, the juvenile court shall use the standardized behavioral or mental health disorder screening developed pursuant to section 16-11.9-102 and conduct the screening in accordance with procedures established pursuant
to section 16-11.9-102.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 635, § 2, effective October 1; (1)(l) amended and (6) repealed, (HB 21-1315), ch. 461, p. 3118, § 28, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-907 as it existed prior to 2021.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1315, see section 1 of chapter 461, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

19-2.5-1104. Sentencing - restitution by juvenile.

If the court finds that a juvenile who receives a deferral of adjudication or who is adjudicated a juvenile delinquent has damaged a victim's personal or real property, that the victim's personal property has been lost, or that personal injury has been
caused to a victim as a result of the juvenile's delinquent act, the court, in addition to any other sentence or commitment that it may impose on the juvenile pursuant to section 19-2.5-1103, shall enter a sentencing order
requiring the juvenile to make restitution as required by article 18.5 of title 16 and part 6 of article 1.3 of title 18.

Restitution must be ordered to be paid in a reasonable manner, as determined by the court and in accordance with article 18.5 of title 16 and part 6 of article 1.3 of title 18.

Notwithstanding section 18-1.3-602 (4)(a)(III) or any other provision of law, a court shall not order a juvenile to pay restitution to an insurance company. A court may order a juvenile to pay restitution to a victim for the portion of a victim's pecuniary
loss for which the victim cannot be compensated under a policy of insurance, self-insurance, an indemnity agreement, or a risk management fund.

As used in this section, "victim" does not mean an insurance company, as defined in section 38-13-102 (13), for purposes of restitution in juvenile cases.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 637, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(3) and (4) added, (HB 22-1373), ch. 392, p. 2772, § 1, effective June 7.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-918 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1105. Sentencing - fines.

Except as otherwise set forth in section 19-2.5-1127 for an aggravated juvenile offender, the court may, as the sole punishment or in addition to any other sentence or commitment specified in section 19-2.5-1103, impose on the juvenile a fine of not more
than three hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 638, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-917 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1106. Sentencing - probation - supervised community service or work program.

Except as otherwise provided in section 19-2.5-1127 for an aggravated juvenile offender:

The court may place the juvenile on probation or under protective supervision in the legal custody of one or both of the juvenile's parents or guardian under such conditions as the court may impose;

The court may place the juvenile on probation and place the juvenile in the juvenile intensive supervision program created pursuant to section 19-2.5-1409;

The court may require as a condition of probation that the juvenile report for assignment to a supervised work program, place the juvenile in a child care facility that provides a supervised work program, or require that the juvenile's custodial parent
or guardian assist the juvenile in participating in a supervised work program, if:

The juvenile is not deprived of the schooling that is appropriate to the juvenile's age, needs, and specific rehabilitative goals;

The supervised work program is of a constructive nature designed to promote rehabilitation, is appropriate to the juvenile's age level and physical ability, and is combined with counseling from a juvenile probation officer or other guidance personnel;
and

The supervised work program assignment is made for a period of time consistent with the juvenile's best interest, but not exceeding one hundred eighty days.

Except as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, as a condition of a deferral of adjudication or of probation, in conjunction with other dispositional orders, or otherwise, the court may order the juvenile to participate in a supervised community
service or community work program if the court finds that the program will promote the purposes of this title 19 as set forth in section 19-1-102.

Participation by the juvenile, or by both the juvenile and the juvenile's parent or guardian, in a community service or work program may be ordered in addition to or in conjunction with an order to pay restitution pursuant to section 19-2.5-1104 or 19-2.5-1110.

With the written consent of the victim of the juvenile's delinquent act, the juvenile, or both the juvenile and the custodial parent, the juvenile's parent who has parental responsibilities, or the juvenile's guardian may be ordered to perform work for
the victim.

Any order issued by the court pursuant to this section must be structured to allow the juvenile to continue regular school attendance and any employment, if appropriate, and must be suitable to the juvenile's age and abilities. The amount of community
service or work ordered must be reasonably related to the seriousness of the juvenile's delinquent act.

The court may order any agency or person supervising a juvenile in a community service or work program to advise the court concerning the juvenile's participation in the program in such manner as the court requires.

The court may order, as a condition of probation, that the juvenile be placed out of the home in a residential child care facility providing a supervised work program or that the juvenile in such facility report to a supervised work program if the court
finds the following:

That the juvenile will not be deprived of the education that is appropriate to the juvenile's age, needs, and specific rehabilitative goals;

That the supervised work program is of a constructive nature designed to promote rehabilitation, is appropriate to the juvenile's age level and physical ability, and is combined with counseling from a probation officer or other guidance personnel; and

That the supervised work program assignment is made for a period of time consistent with the juvenile's best interest but not exceeding one hundred eighty days.

The probation department of the court is responsible for establishing and identifying suitable work programs and assignments. Boards of county commissioners, county sheriffs, and political subdivisions shall cooperate to establish work programs. The cooperation
of suitable nonprofit organizations and other entities may be sought to establish suitable work programs.

For purposes of the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, "public employee" does not include any juvenile who is ordered to participate in a work or community service program pursuant to this section.

A governmental entity or cooperating nonprofit organization is not liable pursuant to the "Workers' Compensation Act of Colorado", articles 40 to 47 of title 8, or pursuant to the "Colorado Employment Security Act", articles 70 to 82 of title 8, for any
benefits on account of any juvenile who is ordered to participate in a work or community service program pursuant to this section, but nothing in this subsection (10) prohibits a governmental entity or cooperating nonprofit
organization from electing to accept the provisions of the "Workers' Compensation Act of Colorado" by purchasing and keeping in force a policy of workers' compensation insurance covering the person.

A general public liability insurance policy obtained to cover juveniles performing work or community service pursuant to this section and to provide coverage for injuries caused to or by juveniles performing work or community service pursuant to this
section must be in a sum of not less than the current limit on government liability under the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 638, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former §§ 19-2-913 and 19-2-308 as they existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1107. Juvenile probation officers - powers and duties.

A juvenile probation officer appointed pursuant to section 19-2.5-1406 shall investigate and keep written records of such investigations as the court may direct.

When a juvenile is placed on probation, the juvenile probation officer shall give the juvenile a written statement of the terms and conditions of the juvenile's probation and shall explain fully the terms and conditions to the juvenile, unless the court
gave and explained the statement to the juvenile pursuant to section 19-2.5-1108.

Each juvenile probation officer shall keep informed as to the condition and conduct of each juvenile placed under the juvenile probation officer's supervision and shall report to the court as directed.

Each juvenile probation officer shall use all suitable methods, including counseling, to aid each juvenile under the juvenile probation officer's supervision and shall perform such other duties in connection with the care and custody of juveniles as the
court may direct.

Each juvenile probation officer shall keep complete records of all work done, as well as complete accounts of all money collected from those under supervision.

A juvenile probation officer, for the purpose of performing the juvenile probation officer's duties, has all the powers of a peace officer, as described in sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-138.

When a juvenile probation officer learns that a juvenile under the juvenile probation officer's supervision has changed residence to another county, temporarily or permanently, the juvenile probation officer shall immediately notify the court.

If, after the court is notified pursuant to subsection (5)(a) of this section, the court determines that it is in the best interest of the juvenile to transfer jurisdiction to the court in the county in which the juvenile resides or is to reside, the
court shall immediately notify such court and shall enter an order transferring jurisdiction to such court. The court transferring jurisdiction pursuant to this subsection (5)(b) shall transmit all documents and legal
and social records, or certified copies thereof, to the receiving court, together with the order transferring jurisdiction. The receiving court shall proceed with the case as if the petition had been originally filed
in said court.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 640, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-926 as it existed prior to 2021.